Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3110
Tax credit; annual limit.

The department may approve tax credits under the Relocation Incentive Act each year until the total amount of credits approved for the year reaches one million dollars.

Laws 2024, LB1023, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB650, § 46.